Washington statutes.
RCW 19.80.010

Registration required.

Each person or persons who carries on, conducts, or transacts business in this state under any trade name must register that trade name with the department as provided in this section.

(1) Sole proprietorship or general partnership: The registration must set forth the true and real name or names of each person conducting the same, together with the post office address or addresses of each such person and the name of the general partnership, if applicable.

(2) Foreign or domestic limited partnership: The registration must set forth the limited partnership name as filed with the office of the secretary of state.

(3) Foreign or domestic limited liability company: The registration must set forth the limited liability company name as filed with the office of the secretary of state.

(4) Foreign or domestic corporation: The registration must set forth the corporate name as filed with the office of the secretary of state.

(5) Other business entities: The registration must set forth the entity's name as required by the department.

[ 2013 c 144 s 32; 2011 c 298 s 14; 2000 c 174 s 2; 1996 c 231 s 3; 1984 c 130 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 22 s 1; 1907 c 145 s 1; RRS s 9976.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1984 c 130: See note following RCW 19.80.001.

Adoption of rules—1979 ex.s. c 22: "The director of the department of licensing shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the transfer of duties and of records required by section 1 of this 1979 act. Such rules shall provide for transfer of existing certificates from the counties to the department, set fees for filing of certificates and amendments, and set fees for obtaining copies thereof." [ 1979 ex.s. c 22 s 3.]

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 22: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1979." [ 1979 ex.s. c 22 s 4.]